Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; METRO MEALS ON WHEELS.new text end new text begin (a) $497,500 in fiscal year 2026 and $497,500 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Metro Meals on Wheels to provide: new text end new text begin (1) home-delivered meals to veterans; and new text end new text begin (2) technical, enrollment, outreach, and volunteer recruitment assistance to member programs. new text end new text begin (b) Metro Meals on Wheels must report to the commissioner of veterans affairs and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans affairs policy and finance no later than September 1, 2026, for fiscal year 2026, and September 1, 2027, for fiscal year 2027. Each report must include, at a minimum, a detailed explanation of how the grant money was used and the number of veterans and service members served by the program. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end